Georgia, session 2025_26, HB852.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) Pursuant to Code Section 21-2-40 of the O.C.G.A., as of July 1, 2025, the Athens-Clarke
County Board of Elections and Registration shall be reconstituted and reestablished, and such
board shall have the powers and duties of the election superintendent of Athens-Clarke
H. B. 852
- 1 -

LC 47 3685
County relating to the conduct of elections and the powers and duties of the board of
registrars relating to the registration of voters and absentee balloting procedures.
(b) The board provided for in subsection (a) of this section shall be the successor to the
Athens-Clarke County Board of Elections and Registration, provided for in an Act to create
the Athens-Clarke County Board of Elections and Registration, approved April 5, 1993,
(Ga. L. 1993, p. 4631), as amended.
SECTION 2.
(a) Such board shall be composed of five members, each of whom shall be an elector and
a resident of Clarke County and who shall be selected in the following manner:
(1) One member shall be appointed by the governing authority of Athens-Clarke County
from nominations made by the county executive committee of the political party whose
candidates at the last preceding general election held for the election of all members of the
General Assembly received the largest number of votes in Athens-Clarke County for
members of the General Assembly;
(2) One member shall be appointed by the governing authority of Athens-Clarke County
from nominations made by the county executive committee of the political party whose
candidates at the election described in paragraph (1) of this subsection received the second
largest number of such votes; and
(3)(A) Three members shall be appointed by the governing authority of Athens-Clarke
County from lists of nominees compiled by each judge of the judicial circuit which
includes Athens-Clarke County. Each such judge shall nominate two individuals to said
governing authority, and a majority of such governing authority shall appoint board
members nominated by such judges. Such members shall be appointed without regard
to political affiliation.
(B) In the event that such judges do not provide a list of nominees to the board within 45
days of either:
H. B. 852
- 2 -

LC 47 3685
(i) The appointment of members by the governing authority of Athens-Clarke County
pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this section at the beginning of
a board term; or
(ii) A vacancy occurring in the office of a member pursuant to this paragraph,
the remaining members of the board shall compile a list of at least three nominees and
submit such list to the governing authority of Athens-Clarke County to appoint a board
member from such list of nominees.
(b) In the event that the governing authority of Athens-Clarke County does not appoint a
member within 30 days of receiving nominations pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of
subsection (a) of this section, the chief judge of the judicial circuit which includes
Athens-Clarke County shall appoint such member from said nominations.
(c) Unless removed from office as provided in this Act, the members of the board shall serve
terms of office of two years and until their successors are appointed and qualified; provided,
however, that the initial members of the board appointed pursuant to this Act shall serve
terms of office of one year and until their successors are appointed and qualified.
SECTION 3.
(a) Any elector and resident of Clarke County shall be eligible for membership on the board
except that no person who holds elective public office shall be eligible during the term of
such elective office and the position of any member shall be deemed vacant upon such
member's qualifying as a candidate for elective public office.
(b) Each member of the board shall take substantially the same oath as required by law for
registrars before entering upon such member's duties. Each member shall have the same
privileges from arrest provided by law for registrars.
H. B. 852
- 3 -

LC 47 3685
SECTION 4.
(a) In the event a vacancy occurs in the office of any appointed member of the board before
the expiration of such member's term, whether by removal, death, resignation, or otherwise,
the respective nominating authority shall, within 90 days following such vacancy, nominate
potential successors for appointment by the governing authority of Athens-Clarke County
to serve the remainder of the unexpired term. The clerk of the Superior Court of
Athens-Clarke County shall be notified of any such interim appointments and shall record
and certify such appointments in the same manner as the regular appointment of members.
(b) All members shall be subject to removal from the board at any time for cause after notice
and hearing in the same manner and by the same authority as provided for removal of
registrars.
(c) The clerk of the superior court shall record each of such certifications on the minutes of
the court, shall certify the name of each member to the Secretary of State, and shall provide
for the issuance of appropriate commissions to the members as provided by law for
registrars.
SECTION 5.
(a) The board shall be empowered with all the powers and duties of election superintendents
relating to the conduct of primaries and elections pursuant to the provisions of Title 21 of the
O.C.G.A.
(b) The board shall be empowered with all the powers and duties of the board of registrars
relating to the registration of voters and absentee balloting procedures pursuant to the
provisions of Title 21 of the O.C.G.A.
(c) This Act is intended to implement the provisions of subsection (b) of Code
Section 21-2-40 of the O.C.G.A. and shall be construed liberally so as to effectuate that
purpose.
H. B. 852
- 4 -

LC 47 3685
SECTION 6.
Compensation for members of the board and its employees and clerical assistants shall be
fixed by the governing authority of Athens-Clarke County and shall be paid from funds of
Athens-Clarke County. The governing authority of Athens-Clarke County shall provide the
board with such proper and suitable offices and with such clerical assistants and other
employees as such governing authority shall deem appropriate.
SECTION 7.
The board shall be responsible for the registration of electors of Athens-Clarke County; the
preparing, equipping, and furnishing of polling places; the counting of all ballots, both
100 absentee and those regularly cast; and for the selection, appointment, and training of poll
101 workers. Such poll workers may be appointed, insofar as practicable, from a list provided
102 to the board by the county executive committee of each political party.
103 SECTION 8.
104 (a) The supervisor of elections and registration for Athens-Clarke County, hereinafter
105 referred to as "the supervisor," shall be the chief executive officer and shall generally
106 supervise, direct, and control the administration of the affairs of the board pursuant to law
107 and duly adopted resolutions of the board. The board shall fix and establish, by appropriate
108 resolution entered on its minutes, directives governing the execution of matters within its
109 jurisdiction.
110 (b) The supervisor shall not be a member of the board. The supervisor shall be appointed
111 and removed by the manager of the Unified Government of Athens-Clarke County in the
112 same manner as department heads. The supervisor shall provide daily employee supervision,
113 serve as staff support for the board, attend all meetings of the board, carry out the duties of
114 voter registration and elections as required by law, and be a full-time employee of the
115 Unified Government of Athens-Clarke County.
H. B. 852
- 5 -

LC 47 3685
116 SECTION 9.
117 (a) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to require or prohibit joint primaries or to require
118 or prohibit the county governing authority or any other public agency to bear any expense
119 of conducting primaries not otherwise required by law.
120 (b) The board shall have the authority to contract with any municipal corporation located
121 within the county for the holding by the board of any primary or election to be conducted
122 within the municipal corporation.
123 SECTION 10.
124 With the consent of the governing authority, the board shall be authorized to expend public
125 funds for the purpose of preparing and distributing material solely to inform and instruct
126 electors of the county adequately with regard to elections. No material distributed by the
127 board shall contain or express, in any manner or form, any commentary or expression of
128 opinion, or request for support, with respect to any political issue or matter of political
129 concern.
130 SECTION 11.
131 (a) The board shall be authorized and empowered to organize itself; elect its officers,
132 including its chairperson, from within its own members; determine its procedural rules and
133 regulations; adopt bylaws; specify the functions and duties of its employees; and otherwise
134 take such action as is appropriate to the management of the affairs committed to its
135 supervision; provided, however, that no such action shall conflict with state law.
136 (b) Action and decision by the board shall be by a majority vote of the members of the
137 board.
H. B. 852
- 6 -

LC 47 3685
138 SECTION 12.
139 (a) The board shall fix and establish by appropriate resolution entered on its minutes
140 directives governing the execution of matters within its jurisdiction. The board shall hold
141 regular monthly meetings at the county courthouse or at the place of meeting of the county
142 governing authority.
143 (b) All meetings of the board shall be conducted in the manner specified in Chapter 14 of
144 Title 50 of the O.C.G.A., relating to open and public meetings.
145 SECTION 13.
146 The governing authority of the county shall expend public funds to provide the supervisor
147 with such proper and suitable administrative offices and with such clerical assistants and
148 other employees as the governing authority shall deem appropriate in accordance with the
149 merit system. Compensation for such administrative personnel shall be paid by the
150 governing authority wholly from county funds.
151 SECTION 14.
152 Compensation for board members shall be set by the county governing authority and shall
153 be paid by the governing authority wholly from county funds.
154 SECTION 15.
155 As used in this Act, the terms "election," "elector," "political party," "primary," and "public
156 office" shall have the same meaning as ascribed to those words by Title 21 of the O.C.G.A.,
157 unless otherwise clearly apparent from the text of this Act.
158 SECTION 16.
159 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
160 without such approval, provided that an Act amending an Act to create the Athens-Clarke
H. B. 852
- 7 -

LC 47 3685
161 County Board of Elections and Registration, approved April 5, 1993 (Ga. L. 1993, p. 4631),
162 as amended, is enacted in the 2025 session of the General Assembly of Georgia providing
163 for the abolition of such board of elections and registration on a date certain; if such abolition
164 Act is not so approved, this Act shall not become effective and shall be automatically
165 repealed on July 1, 2025.
166 SECTION 17.
167 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 852
- 8 -